apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="sist__adj">
<e r="RL"><p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="heilag__adj">
<e>       <p><l>are</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aste</l>  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ste</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ast</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>st</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sak/leg__adj">
<e>       <p><l>leg</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>leg</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>lege</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>lege</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>legare</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>legast</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>legaste</l>      <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>lig</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>lig</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>lige</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>lige</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ligare</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ligast</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ligaste</l>      <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bortse/dd__adj">
<e><p><l>dde</l>        <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>dde</l>        <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>dd</l> <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>tt</l> <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="van/d__adj">
<!-- both 'vand' and 'vant' in norsk ordbank -->
<e r="LR"><p><l>dare</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>tare</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>daste</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>taste</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>dast</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>tast</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fåfeng/d__adj">
<!-- both 'fåfengd' and 'fåfengt' lemmas in norsk ordbank -->
<e>       <p><l>tare</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>	    <p><l>d</l>	    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>	    <p><l>t</l>	    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>	    <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>	    <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>	    <p><l>taste</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>	    <p><l>tast</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="OK__adj">
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="første__adj">
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- /adjectives -->

</pardefs>

<e lm="sist">            <i>sist</i><par n="sist__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fåfengd">	 <i>fåfeng</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vand">            <i>van</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innestengd">      <i>innesteng</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innlagd">         <i>innlag</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uvand">           <i>uvan</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="særskild">        <i>særskil</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tillitsvald">     <i>tillitsval</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="folkevald">       <i>folkeval</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utvald">          <i>utval</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortskjemd">      <i>bortskjem</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ovannemnd">       <i>ovannemn</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="førnemnd">        <i>førnemn</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="urørd">           <i>urør</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ukjend">          <i>ukjen</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utseld">          <i>utsel</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uavgjord">        <i>uavgjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forseggjord">     <i>forseggjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uoppgjord">       <i>uoppgjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unnagjord">       <i>unnagjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilgjord">        <i>tilgjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjølvsagd">       <i>sjølvsag</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="betydeleg">       <i>betyde</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dårleg">          <i>dår</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ettertrykkjeleg"> <i>ettertrykkje</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsvarleg">      <i>forsvar</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hjerteleg">       <i>hjerte</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="løynleg">         <i>løyn</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påpasseleg">      <i>påpasse</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smerteleg">       <i>smerte</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tydeleg">         <i>tyde</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unaturleg">       <i>unatur</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uttrykkeleg">     <i>uttrykke</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="framkomeleg">     <i>framkome</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heilag">          <i>heilag</i><par n="heilag__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frittståande">    <i>frittståande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="levande">         <i>levande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="næringsdrivande"> <i>næringsdrivande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påtroppande">     <i>påtroppande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilgrensande">    <i>tilgrensande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utøvande">        <i>utøvande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="øvstkommanderande"><i>øvstkommanderande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utandørs">        <i>utandørs</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spesial">         <i>spesial</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nymotens">        <i>nymotens</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innvortes">       <i>innvortes</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frilans">         <i>frilans</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="austleg">         <i>aust</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="djuptgåande">     <i>djuptgåande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="høgre">           <i>høgre</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hovudtillitsvalt"><i>hovudtillitsval</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heiderleg">        <i>heider</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ualminneleg">     <i>ualminne</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uselt">           <i>usel</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fryktinngytande"> <i>fryktinngytande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vidaregåande">    <i>vidaregåande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="umogeleg">        <i>umoge</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="første">          <i>første</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="andre">           <i>andre</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tredje">		 <i>tredje</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fjerde">          <i>fjerde</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjette">          <i>sjette</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="åttande">         <i>åttande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tiande">          <i>tiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tolvte">          <i>tolvte</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fjortande">       <i>fjortande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sekstande">       <i>sekstande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="attande">         <i>attande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tjuande">         <i>tjuande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="førtiande">         <i>førtiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sekstiande">         <i>sekstiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="åttiande">         <i>åttiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="[0-9]+.">         <re>[0-9]+</re><i>.</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
